Illinois, session 104th, HB1866.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Emergency Telephone System Act is amended 5by changing Sections 2, 3, 6.2, 7, 7.1, 10, 10.3, 11.5, 15.2, 615.3, 15.4, 15.4a, 15.4b, 15.6b, 16, 17.5, 19, 20, 30, 35, 40, 780, and 99 and by adding Section 15.9 as follows: 8    (50 ILCS 750/2)  (from Ch. 134, par. 32)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)10    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 11context otherwise requires: 12    "9-1-1 network" means the network used for the delivery of 139-1-1 calls and messages over dedicated and redundant 14facilities to a primary or backup 9-1-1 PSAP that meets the 15appropriate grade of service. 16    "9-1-1 system" means the geographic area that has been 17granted an order of authority by the Commission or the 18Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator to use "9-1-1" as the primary 19emergency telephone number, including, but not limited to, the 20network, software applications, databases, CPE components and 21operational and management procedures required to provide 229-1-1 service. 23    "9-1-1 Authority" means an Emergency Telephone System   HB1866 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1Board or Joint Emergency Telephone System Board that provides 2for the management and operation of a 9-1-1 system. "9-1-1 3Authority" includes the Illinois State Police only to the 4extent it provides 9-1-1 services under this Act.5    "9-1-1 System Manager" means the manager, director, 6administrator, or coordinator who at the direction of his or 7her Emergency Telephone System Board is responsible for the 8implementation and execution of the order of authority issued 9by the Commission or the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator through 10the programs, policies, procedures, and daily operations of 11the 9-1-1 system consistent with the provisions of this Act. 12    "Administrator" means the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator.13    "Advanced service" means any telecommunications service 14with or without dynamic bandwidth allocation, including, but 15not limited to, ISDN Primary Rate Interface (PRI), that, 16through the use of a DS-1, T-1, or other un-channelized or 17multi-channel transmission facility, is capable of 18transporting either the subscriber's inter-premises voice 19telecommunications services to the public switched network or 20the subscriber's 9-1-1 calls to the public agency.21    "Aggregator" means an entity that ingresses 9-1-1 calls of 22multiple traffic types or 9-1-1 calls from multiple 23originating service providers and combines them on a trunk 24group or groups (or equivalent egress connection arrangement 25to a 9-1-1 system provider's E9-1-1/NG9-1-1 network or 26system), and that uses the routing information provided in the   HB1866 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1received call setup signaling to select the appropriate trunk 2group and proceeds to signal call setup toward the 9-1-1 3system provider. "Aggregator" includes an originating service 4provider that provides aggregation functions for its own 9-1-1 5calls. "Aggregator" also includes an aggregation network or an 6aggregation entity that provides aggregator services for other 7types of system providers, such as cloud-based services or 8enterprise networks as its client. 9    "ALI" or "automatic location identification" means the 10automatic display at the public safety answering point of the 11address or location of the caller's telephone and 12supplementary emergency services information of the location 13from which a call originates.14    "ANI" or "automatic number identification" means the 15automatic display of the 10-digit telephone number associated 16with the caller's telephone number.17    "Automatic alarm" and "automatic alerting device" mean any 18device that will access the 9-1-1 system for emergency 19services upon activation and does not provide for two-way 20communication.21    "Answering point" means a PSAP, SAP, Backup PSAP, Unmanned 22Backup Answering Point, or VAP.23    "Authorized entity" means an answering point or 24participating agency other than a decommissioned PSAP. 25    "Backup PSAP" means an answering point that meets the 26appropriate standards of service and serves as an alternate to   HB1866 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1the PSAP operating independently from the PSAP at a different 2location that has the capability to direct dispatch for the 3PSAP or otherwise transfer emergency calls directly to an 4authorized entity. A backup PSAP may accept overflow calls 5from the PSAP or be activated if the primary PSAP is disabled. 6    "Board" means an Emergency Telephone System Board or a 7Joint Emergency Telephone System Board created pursuant to 8Section 15.4.9    "Bylaws" means a set of regulations that ensure consistent 10and agreed upon voting and decision-making procedures. 11    "Call back number" means a number used by a PSAP to 12recontact a location from which a 9-1-1 call was placed, 13regardless of whether that number is a direct-dial number for 14a station used to originate a 9-1-1 call. 15    "Carrier" includes a telecommunications carrier and a 16wireless carrier.17    "Commission" means the Illinois Commerce Commission.18    "Computer aided dispatch" or "CAD" means a computer-based 19system that aids public safety telecommunicators or 20telecommunicator supervisors by automating selected 21dispatching and recordkeeping activities.22    "Direct dispatch" means a 9-1-1 service wherein upon 23receipt of an emergency call, a public safety telecommunicator 24or telecommunicator supervisors transmits, without - without 25delay, transfer, relay, or referral, referral - all relevant 26available information to the appropriate public safety   HB1866 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1personnel or emergency responders.2    "Dispatchable location" means a location delivered to the 3PSAP with a 9-1-1 call that consists of the validated street 4address of the calling party, plus a 9-1-1 caller and 5additional information, such as a suite or apartment 6identifier, uncertainty data room number, floor number, or 7similar information, necessary to accurately identify the 8location of the calling party 9-1-1 caller. 9    "Decommissioned" means the revocation of a PSAPs authority 10to handle 9-1-1 calls as an answering point within the 9-1-1 11network. 12    "Diversion" means the obligation or expenditure of a 9-1-1 13fee or charge for a purpose or function other than the purposes 14and functions designated by the Federal Communications 15Commission as acceptable under 47 CFR 9.23. "Diversion" 16includes distribution of a 9-1-1 fee or charge to a political 17subdivision that obligates or expends such fees for a purpose 18or function other than those designated as acceptable by the 19Federal Communications Commission under 47 CFR 9.23. 20    "DS-1, T-1, or similar un-channelized or multi-channel 21transmission facility" means a facility that can transmit and 22receive a bit rate of at least 1.544 megabits per second 23(Mbps).24    "Dynamic bandwidth allocation" means the ability of the 25facility or customer to drop and add channels, or adjust 26bandwidth, when needed in real time for voice or data   HB1866 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1purposes.2    "Emergency call" means any type of request for emergency 3assistance through a 9-1-1 network either to the digits 9-1-1 4or the emergency 24/7 10-digit telephone number for all 5answering points. An emergency call is not limited to a voice 6telephone call. It could be a two-way video call, an 7interactive text, Teletypewriter (TTY), an SMS, an Instant 8Message, or any new mechanism for communications available in 9the future. An emergency call occurs when the request for 10emergency assistance is received by a public safety 11telecommunicator. 12    "Emergency Telephone System Board" or "ETSB" means (i) a 13board appointed by the corporate authorities of any county or 14municipality to provide for the management and operation of a 159-1-1 system within the scope of the duties and powers 16prescribed by this Act or (ii) a joint Emergency Telephone 17System Board. 18    "EMS personnel" has the meaning given to that term in 19Section 3.5 of the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems 20Act. 21    "Enhanced 9-1-1" or "E9-1-1" means a telephone system that 22includes network switching, database and PSAP premise elements 23capable of providing automatic location identification data, 24selective routing, selective transfer, fixed transfer, and a 25call back number, including any enhanced 9-1-1 service so 26designated by the Federal Communications Commission in its   HB1866 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1report and order in WC Dockets Nos. 04-36 and 05-196, or any 2successor proceeding.3    "ETSB" means an emergency telephone system board appointed 4by the corporate authorities of any county or municipality 5that provides for the management and operation of a 9-1-1 6system.7    "First responder" means someone designated by a public 8safety agency who is charged with responding to emergency 9service requests, including emergency communications 10professionals, public safety telecommunicators, public safety 11telecommunicator supervisors, and police, fire, and EMS 12personnel who operate in the field. 13    "Grade of service" means the P.01 for E9-1-1 services or 14the equivalent for NENA Baseline NG9-1-1 as set forth in the 15NENA i3 Solution prevailing national adopted standard. 16    "Hearing-impaired individual" means a person with a 17permanent hearing loss who can regularly and routinely 18communicate by telephone only through the aid of devices which 19can send and receive written messages over the telephone 20network.21    "Hosted supplemental 9-1-1 service" means a database 22service that:23        (1) electronically provides information for to 9-1-1 24    call takers when a call is placed to 9-1-1;25        (2) allows telephone subscribers to provide 26    information to 9-1-1 to be used in emergency scenarios;  HB1866 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1        (3) collects a variety of formatted data relevant to 2    9-1-1 and first responder needs, which may include, but is 3    not limited to, photographs of the telephone subscribers, 4    physical descriptions, medical information, household 5    data, and emergency contacts;6        (4) allows for information to be entered by telephone 7    subscribers through a secure website where they can elect 8    to provide as little or as much information as they 9    choose; 10        (5) automatically displays data provided by telephone 11    subscribers to 9-1-1 call takers for all types of 12    telephones when a call is placed to 9-1-1 from a 13    registered and confirmed phone number;14        (6) (blank); supports the delivery of telephone 15    subscriber information through a secure internet 16    connection to all emergency telephone system boards;17        (7) (blank); works across all 9-1-1 call taking 18    equipment and allows for the easy transfer of information 19    into a computer aided dispatch system; and20        (8) (blank); may be used to collect information 21    pursuant to an Illinois Premise Alert Program as defined 22    in the Illinois Premise Alert Program (PAP) Act23        (9) supports the delivery of telephone subscriber 24    information through a secure internet connection to all 25    emergency telephone system boards;26        (10) works across all 9-1-1 call-taking equipment and   HB1866 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1    allows for the easy transfer of information into a 2    computer aided dispatch system; and3        (11) may be used to collect information pursuant to an 4    Illinois Premise Alert Program as defined in the Illinois 5    Premise Alert Program (PAP) Act.6    "Interconnected voice service" means a telecommunications 7service that:8        (1) allows users to make and receive calls to and from 9    the public switched telephone network or other phone 10    lines, including both traditional landline and mobile 11    services;12        (2) enables users to make or receive voice calls to or 13    from telephone numbers assigned to the public switched 14    telephone network, including calls to and from emergency 15    services;16        (3) requires a connection to the public switched 17    telephone network (PSTN) either directly or through other 18    interconnected services;19        (4) supports standard telephone functions, such as 20    making and receiving calls, voicemail, and the ability to 21    connect with other telephone networks;22        (5) complies with various FCC regulations to ensure 23    user safety, including the requirement to support 9-1-1 24    services, allowing emergency responders to locate the 25    caller; and26        (6) can be provided over various technologies,   HB1866 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1    including traditional telephone lines, broadband Internet 2    connections via VoIP, and mobile networks.3    "Interconnected voice service" includes voice over 4Internet protocol (VoIP) services that are integrated into the 5public telephone system and the availability of other 6essential services like number portability and accessibility 7for people with disabilities.8    "Interconnected voice over Internet protocol provider" or 9"Interconnected VoIP provider" has the meaning given to that 10term under Section 13-235 of the Public Utilities Act.11    "Joint Emergency Telephone System Board" or "Joint ETSB" 12means a Joint Emergency Telephone System Board established by 13intergovernmental agreement of two or more municipalities or 14counties, or a combination thereof, to provide for the 15management and operation of a 9-1-1 system.16    "Key telephone system" means a type of MLTS designed to 17provide shared access to several outside lines through buttons 18or keys typically offering identified access lines with direct 19line appearance or termination on a given telephone set. 20    "Local public agency" means any unit of local government 21or special purpose district located in whole or in part within 22this State that provides or has authority to provide 23firefighting, police, ambulance, medical, or other emergency 24services.25    "Mechanical dialer" means any device that accesses the 269-1-1 system without human intervention and does not provide   HB1866 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1for two-way communication.2    "Master Street Address Guide" or "MSAG" is a database of 3street names and house ranges within their associated 4communities defining emergency service zones (ESZs) and their 5associated emergency service numbers (ESNs) to enable proper 6routing of 9-1-1 calls.7    "Mobile telephone number" or "MTN" means the telephone 8number assigned to a wireless telephone at the time of initial 9activation.10    "Multi-line telephone system" or "MLTS" means a system 11composed that is comprised of a common control unit or units, 12telephone sets, control hardware and software, and adjunct 13systems, including and that enables users to make and receive 14telephone calls using shared resources, such as telephone 15network trunks or data link bandwidth. The terms "multi-line 16telephone system" and "MLTS" include, but are not limited to: 17network-based and premises-based systems, such as Centrex 18service; premises-based, hosted, and cloud-based VoIP, as well 19as systems; PBX, hybrid, and key telephone systems (as 20classified by the Federal Communications Commission under 47 21CFR Part 68, which includes or any successor rules); and 22systems owned or leased by governmental agencies, nonprofit 23entities, and for-profit businesses. "Multi-line telephone 24system" or "MLTS" includes the full range of networked 25communication systems that serve enterprises, including 26IP-based and cloud-based systems. "Multi-line telephone   HB1866 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1system" or "MLTS" also includes outbound-only MLTS that allow 2users to make 9-1-1 calls but do not enable PSAPs to place a 3return call directly to the 9-1-1 caller. 4    "Network connections" means the number of voice grade 5communications channels directly between a subscriber and a 6telecommunications carrier's public switched network, without 7the intervention of any other telecommunications carrier's 8switched network, which would be required to carry the 9subscriber's inter-premises traffic and which connection 10either (1) is capable of providing access through the public 11switched network to a 9-1-1 Emergency Telephone System, if one 12exists, or (2) if no system exists at the time a surcharge is 13imposed under Section 15.3 or 20, that would be capable of 14providing access through the public switched network to the 15local 9-1-1 Emergency Telephone System if one existed. Where 16multiple voice grade communications channels are connected to 17a telecommunications carrier's public switched network through 18a private branch exchange (PBX) service, there shall be 19determined to be one network connection for each trunk line 20capable of transporting either the subscriber's inter-premises 21traffic to the public switched network or the subscriber's 229-1-1 calls to the public agency. Where multiple voice grade 23communications channels are connected to an OSP's public 24switched network through Centrex type service, the number of 25network connections shall be equal to the number of PBX trunk 26equivalents for the subscriber's service or other multiple   HB1866 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1voice grade communication channels facility, as determined by 2reference to any generally applicable exchange access service 3tariff filed by the subscriber's telecommunications carrier 4with the Commission.5    "Network costs" means those recurring costs that directly 6relate to the operation of the 9-1-1 network as determined by 7the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator with the advice of the 8Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board, which may include, but need 9not be limited to, some or all of the following: costs for 10interoffice trunks, selective routing charges, transfer lines 11and toll charges for 9-1-1 services, Automatic Location 12Information (ALI) database charges, independent local exchange 13carrier charges and non-system provider charges, carrier 14charges for third party database for on-site customer premises 15equipment, back-up PSAP trunks for non-system providers, 16periodic database updates as provided by carrier (also known 17as "ALI data dump"), regional ALI storage charges, circuits 18for call delivery (fiber or circuit connection), NG9-1-1 19costs, and all associated fees, taxes, and surcharges on each 20invoice. "Network costs" shall not include radio circuits or 21toll charges that are other than for 9-1-1 services.22    "Next generation 9-1-1" or "NG9-1-1" means a secure 23Internet Protocol-based (IP-based) open-standards system 24comprised of hardware, software, data, and operational 25policies and procedures that:26            (A) provides standardized interfaces from   HB1866 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1        emergency call and message services to support 2        emergency communications; 3            (B) processes all types of emergency calls, 4        including voice, text, data, and multimedia 5        information; 6            (C) acquires and integrates additional emergency 7        call data useful to call routing and handling;8            (D) delivers the emergency calls, messages, and 9        data to the appropriate public safety answering point 10        and other appropriate emergency entities based on the 11        location of the caller;12            (E) supports data, video, and other communications 13        needs for coordinated incident response and 14        management; and15            (F) interoperates with services and networks used 16        by first responders to facilitate emergency response. 17    "Next generation 9-1-1 costs" or "NG9-1-1 costs" means 18those recurring costs that directly relate to the next 19generation Next Generation 9-1-1 service as determined by the 20Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator with the advice of the Statewide 219-1-1 Advisory Board, which may include, but need not be 22limited to, costs for NENA i3 Core Components (Border Control 23Function (BCF), Emergency Call Routing Function (ECRF), 24Location Validation Function (LVF), Emergency Services Routing 25Proxy (ESRP), Policy Store/Policy Routing Functions (PSPRF), 26and Location Information Servers (LIS)), Statewide ESInet, and   HB1866 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1software external to the PSAP (data collection, identity 2management, aggregation, and GIS functionality), and gateways 3(legacy 9-1-1 tandems or gateways or both).4    "Next generation 9-1-1 core services" or "NGCS" means a 5set of services needed to process a 9-1-1 call on an ESInet. 6"Next generation 9-1-1 core services" or "NGCS" includes, but 7is not limited to, the ESRP, ECRF, LVF, BCF, bridge, policy 8store, logging services, and typical IP services, including 9DNS and DHCP. "Next generation 9-1-1 core services" or "NGCS" 10does not include the network on which the services operate. 11    "Originating service provider" or "OSP" means the entity 12that provides services to end users that may be used to 13originate voice or nonvoice 9-1-1 requests for assistance and 14who would interconnect, in any of various fashions, to the 159-1-1 system provider for purposes of delivering 9-1-1 traffic 16to the public safety answering points. 17    "Primary place of use" or "PPU" means the residential 18street address or the primary business street address where a 19customer primarily uses the mobile telecommunications service. 20"Primary place of use" or "PPU" does not include a post office 21box address.22    "Private branch exchange" or "PBX" means a private 23telephone system and associated equipment located on the 24user's property that provides communications between internal 25stations and external networks.26    "Private business switch service" means network and   HB1866 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1premises based systems including a VoIP, Centrex type service, 2or PBX service, even though key telephone systems or 3equivalent telephone systems registered with the Federal 4Communications Commission under 47 CFR Part 68 are directly 5connected to Centrex type and PBX systems. "Private business 6switch service" does not include key telephone systems or 7equivalent telephone systems registered with the Federal 8Communications Commission under 47 CFR Part 68 when not used 9in conjunction with a VoIP, Centrex type, or PBX systems. 10"Private business switch service" typically includes, but is 11not limited to, private businesses, corporations, and 12industries where the telecommunications service is primarily 13for conducting business.14    "Private residential switch service" means network and 15premise based systems including a VoIP, Centrex type service, 16or PBX service or key telephone systems or equivalent 17telephone systems registered with the Federal Communications 18Commission under 47 CFR Part 68 that are directly connected to 19a VoIP, Centrex type service, or PBX systems equipped for 20switched local network connections or 9-1-1 system access to 21residential end users through a private telephone switch. 22"Private residential switch service" does not include key 23telephone systems or equivalent telephone systems registered 24with the Federal Communications Commission under 47 CFR Part 2568 when not used in conjunction with a VoIP, Centrex type, or 26PBX systems. "Private residential switch service" typically   HB1866 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1includes, but is not limited to, apartment complexes, 2condominiums, and campus or university environments where 3shared tenant service is provided and where the usage of the 4telecommunications service is primarily residential.5    "Public agency" means the State, and any unit of local 6government or special purpose district located in whole or in 7part within this State, that provides or has authority to 8provide firefighting, police, ambulance, medical, or other 9emergency services.10    "Public safety agency" means a functional division of a 11public agency that provides firefighting, police, medical, or 12other emergency services to respond to and manage emergency 13incidents. For the purpose of providing wireless service to 14users of 9-1-1 emergency services, as expressly provided for 15in this Act, the Illinois State Police may be considered a 16public safety agency.17    "Public safety answering point" or "PSAP" means the 18primary answering location of an emergency call that meets the 19appropriate standards of service and is responsible for 20receiving and processing those calls and events according to a 21specified operational policy.22    "PSAP representative" means the manager or supervisor of a 23Public Safety Answering Point (PSAP) who oversees the daily 24operational functions and is responsible for the overall 25management and administration of the PSAP. 26    "Public safety telecommunicator" means any person employed   HB1866 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1in a full-time or part-time capacity at an answering point 2whose duties or responsibilities include answering, receiving, 3or transferring an emergency call for dispatch to the 4appropriate emergency responder. 5    "Public safety telecommunicator supervisor" means any 6person employed in a full-time or part-time capacity at an 7answering point or by a 9-1-1 Authority, whose primary duties 8or responsibilities are to direct, administer, or manage any 9public safety telecommunicator and whose responsibilities 10include answering, receiving, or transferring an emergency 11call for dispatch to the appropriate emergency responders. 12    "Referral" means a 9-1-1 service in which the public 13safety telecommunicator provides the calling party with the 14telephone number of the appropriate public safety agency or 15other provider of emergency services.16    "Regular service" means any telecommunications service, 17other than advanced service, that is capable of transporting 18either the subscriber's inter-premises voice 19telecommunications services to the public switched network or 20the subscriber's 9-1-1 calls to the public agency.21    "Relay" means a 9-1-1 service in which the public safety 22telecommunicator takes the pertinent information from a caller 23and relays that information to the appropriate public safety 24agency or other provider of emergency services.25    "Remit period" means the billing period, one month in 26duration, for which a wireless carrier remits a surcharge and   HB1866 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1provides subscriber information by zip code to the Illinois 2State Police, in accordance with Section 20 of this Act.3    "Secondary Answering Point" or "SAP" means a location, 4other than a PSAP, that is able to receive the voice, data, and 5call back number of E9-1-1 or NG9-1-1 emergency calls 6transferred from a PSAP and completes the call taking process 7by dispatching police, medical, fire, or other emergency 8responders. 9    "Shared residential MLTS service" means the use of one or 10more MLTS or MLTS services to provide telephone service to 11residential facilities, including, but not limited to, 12single-family dwellings and multi-family dwellings, such as 13apartments, even if the service is not individually billed.14    "Shared telecommunications services" means the provision 15of telecommunications and information management services and 16equipment within a user group located in discrete private 17premises in building complexes, campuses, or high-rise 18buildings by a commercial shared services provider or by a 19user association, through privately owned customer premises 20equipment and associated data processing and information 21management services. The term "shared telecommunications 22services" includes the provisioning of connections to the 23facilities of a local exchange carrier or an interexchange 24carrier. 25    "Subscriber" means an individual or entity to whom a 26wireless, wireline, or VoIP service account or number has been   HB1866 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1assigned by a carrier, other than an account or number 2associated with prepaid wireless telecommunication service. 3    "Statewide wireless emergency 9-1-1 system" means all 4areas of the State where an emergency telephone system board 5has not declared its intention for one or more of its public 6safety answering points to serve as a primary wireless 9-1-1 7public safety answering point for its jurisdiction. The 8operator of the statewide wireless emergency 9-1-1 system 9shall be the Illinois State Police.10    "System" means the communications equipment, and related 11software applications, and databases required to produce a 12response by the appropriate emergency public safety agency or 13other provider of emergency services as a result of an 14emergency call being placed to 9-1-1.15    "System provider" means the contracted entity providing 169-1-1 network and database services.17    "Telecommunications carrier" means those entities included 18within the definition specified in Section 13-202 of the 19Public Utilities Act, and includes those carriers acting as 20resellers of telecommunications services. "Telecommunications 21carrier" includes telephone systems operating as mutual 22concerns. "Telecommunications carrier" does not include a 23wireless carrier.24    "Telecommunications technology" means equipment that can 25send and receive written messages over the telephone network.26    "Temporary residence MLTS" means the use of a MLTS or MLTS   HB1866 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1service to provide telephone service to occupants of temporary 2or transient dwellings, including, but not limited to, 3dormitories, hotels, motels, health care facilities, and 4nursing homes, or other similar facilities.5    "Transfer" means a 9-1-1 service in which the public 6safety telecommunicator, who receives an emergency call, 7transmits, redirects, or conferences that call to the 8appropriate public safety agency or other provider of 9emergency services. "Transfer" includes calls transferred, 10within the statewide NG9-1-1 system and to surrounding states 11NG9-1-1 Systems using a SIP URI. "Transfer" shall not include 12(1) a relay or referral of the information without 13transferring the caller or (2) calls transferred to a 10-digit 14number where a SIP URI is available.15    "Transmitting messages" shall have the meaning given to 16that term under Section 8-11-2 of the Illinois Municipal Code.17    "Trunk line" means a transmission path, or group of 18transmission paths, connecting a subscriber's PBX to a 19telecommunications carrier's public switched network. In the 20case of regular service, each voice grade communications 21channel or equivalent amount of bandwidth capable of 22transporting either the subscriber's inter-premises voice 23telecommunications services to the public switched network or 24the subscriber's 9-1-1 calls to the public agency shall be 25considered a trunk line, even if it is bundled with other 26channels or additional bandwidth. In the case of advanced   HB1866 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1service, each DS-1, T-1, or other un-channelized or 2multi-channel transmission facility that is capable of 3transporting either the subscriber's inter-premises voice 4telecommunications services to the public switched network or 5the subscriber's 9-1-1 calls to the public agency shall be 6considered a single trunk line, even if it contains multiple 7voice grade communications channels or otherwise supports 2 or 8more voice grade calls at a time; provided, however, that each 9additional increment of up to 24 voice grade channels of 10transmission capacity that is capable of transporting either 11the subscriber's inter-premises voice telecommunications 12services to the public switched network or the subscriber's 139-1-1 calls to the public agency shall be considered an 14additional trunk line.15    "Unmanned backup answering point" means an answering point 16that serves as an alternate to the PSAP at an alternate 17location and is typically unmanned but can be activated if the 18primary PSAP is disabled.19    "Virtual answering point" or "VAP" means a temporary or 20nonpermanent location that is capable of receiving an 21emergency call, contains a fully functional worksite that is 22not bound to a specific location, but rather is portable and 23scalable, connecting public safety telecommunicators to the 24work process, and is capable of completing the call 25dispatching process. 26    "Voice-grade call" or "VGC" means a telecommunications   HB1866 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1service that allows for the transmission of voice signals with 2sufficient quality for effective communication. 3    "Voice-impaired individual" means a person with a 4permanent speech disability which precludes oral 5communication, who can regularly and routinely communicate by 6telephone only through the aid of devices which can send and 7receive written messages over the telephone network.8    "Wireless" means the delivery of a wireless 9-1-1 call in 9accordance with applicable Federal Communications Commission 10regulations. 11    "Wireless carrier" means a provider of two-way cellular, 12broadband PCS, geographic area 800 MHZ and 900 MHZ Commercial 13Mobile Radio Service (CMRS), Wireless Communications Service 14(WCS), or other Commercial Mobile Radio Service (CMRS), as 15defined by the Federal Communications Commission, offering 16radio communications that may provide fixed, mobile, radio 17location, or satellite communication services to individuals 18or businesses within its assigned spectrum block and 19geographical area or that offers real-time, two-way voice 20service that is interconnected with the public switched 21network, including a reseller of such service.22    "Wireless enhanced 9-1-1" means the ability to relay the 23telephone number of the originator of a 9-1-1 call and 24location information from any mobile handset or text telephone 25device accessing the wireless system to the designated 26wireless public safety answering point as set forth in the   HB1866 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1order of the Federal Communications Commission, FCC Docket No. 294-102, adopted June 12, 1996, with an effective date of 3October 1, 1996, and any subsequent amendment thereto.4    "Wireless public safety answering point" means the 5functional division of a 9-1-1 authority accepting wireless 69-1-1 calls.7    "Wireless subscriber" means an individual or entity to 8whom a wireless service account or number has been assigned by 9a wireless carrier, other than an account or number associated 10with prepaid wireless telecommunication service.11(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 12102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-983, eff. 5-27-22; 103-366, eff. 131-1-24.) 14    (50 ILCS 750/3)  (from Ch. 134, par. 33)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)16    Sec. 3. (a) Every By July 1, 2017, every local public 17agency shall be within the jurisdiction of a 9-1-1 system.18    (b) Within 36 months of the awarding of a contract to a 19vendor certified under Section 13-900 of the Public Utilities 20Act to provide next generation Next Generation 9-1-1 service, 21every 9-1-1 system in Illinois, except in a municipality with 22a population over 500,000, shall provide next generation Next 23Generation 9-1-1 service. A municipality with a population 24over 500,000 shall provide next generation Next Generation 259-1-1 service and shall establish a network-to-network   HB1866 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1interface with the State. Each party shall build out and pay 2for the party's portion to interface with the statewide next 3generation 9-1-1 System by January 1, 2027 2026.4    (c) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit or 5discourage in any way the formation of multijurisdictional or 6regional systems, and any system established pursuant to this 7Act may include the territory of more than one public agency or 8may include a segment of the territory of a public agency.9(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 103-366, eff. 1-1-24; 10103-563, eff. 11-17-23.) 11    (50 ILCS 750/6.2)12    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)13    Sec. 6.2. Every 9-1-1 system shall be able to accept text 14to 9-1-1 no later than December 31, 2025 July 1, 2024. The 15Illinois State Police shall adopt rules for the implementation 16of this Section.17(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 103-366, eff. 1-1-24.) 18    (50 ILCS 750/7)  (from Ch. 134, par. 37)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)20    Sec. 7. The General Assembly finds that, because of 21overlapping jurisdiction of public agencies, public safety 22agencies, and telephone service areas, the Administrator, with 23the advice and recommendation of the Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory 24Board, shall establish a general overview or plan to   HB1866 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1effectuate the purposes of this Act within the time frame 2provided in this Act. The General Assembly further finds and 3declares that direct dispatch should be used if possible to 4shorten the time required for the public to request and 5receive emergency aid. The Administrator shall minimize the 6use of transfer, relay, and referral of an emergency call if 7possible and encourage Backup PSAPs to be able to direct 8dispatch. Transfer, relay, and referral of an emergency call 9to an entity other than an answering point or the Illinois 10State Police shall not be used in response to emergency calls 11unless exigent circumstances exist. In order to ensure insure 12that proper preparation and implementation of emergency 13telephone systems are accomplished by all public agencies as 14required under this Act, the Illinois State Police, with the 15advice and assistance of the Attorney General, shall secure 16compliance by public agencies as provided in this Act.17(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 18102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 19    (50 ILCS 750/7.1)20    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)21    Sec. 7.1. Training.22    (a) Each 9-1-1 Authority, as well as its answering points, 23shall ensure its public safety telecommunicators and public 24safety telecommunicator supervisors Supervisors comply with 25the training, testing, and certification requirements   HB1866 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1established pursuant to Section 2605-53 of the Illinois 2Department of State Police Law.3    (b) Each 9-1-1 Authority, as well as its answering points, 4shall review the training records for maintain a record 5regarding its public safety telecommunicators and public 6safety telecommunicator supervisors Supervisors to ensure that 7they are compliant compliance with this Section for at least 7 8years and shall make the continuing education training records 9available for inspection by the Administrator upon request.10    (c) (Blank). Costs incurred for the development of 11standards, training, testing and certification shall be 12expenses paid by the Department from the funds available to 13the Administrator and the Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board under 14Section 30 of this Act. Nothing in this subsection shall 15prohibit the use of grants or other nonsurcharge funding 16sources available for this purpose.17(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; revised 10-16-24.) 18    (50 ILCS 750/10)  (from Ch. 134, par. 40)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)20    Sec. 10. (a) The Administrator, with the advice and 21recommendation of the Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board, shall 22establish uniform technical and operational standards for all 239-1-1 systems in Illinois. All findings, orders, decisions, 24rules, and regulations issued or promulgated by the Commission 25under this Act or any other Act establishing or conferring   HB1866 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1power on the Commission with respect to emergency 2telecommunications services, shall continue in force. 3Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section, where 4applicable, the Administrator shall, with the advice and 5recommendation of the Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board, amend 6the Commission's findings, orders, decisions, rules, and 7regulations to conform to the specific provisions of this Act 8as soon as practicable after the effective date of this 9amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly. 10    (a-5) All 9-1-1 systems are responsible for complying with 11the uniform technical and operational standards adopted by the 12Administrator and the Illinois State Police with the advice 13and recommendation of the Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board. 14    (b) (Blank). The Illinois State Police may adopt emergency 15rules necessary to implement the provisions of this amendatory 16Act of the 99th General Assembly under subsection (t) of 17Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.18    (b-5) Before January 1, 2016, all local public agencies 19operating a 9-1-1 system shall operate under a plan that has 20been filed with and approved by the Commission or the 21Administrator. Plans filed under this Section shall conform to 22minimum standards established under subsection (a) of Section 2310.24    (c) Nothing in this Act shall deprive the Commission of 25any authority to regulate the provision by telecommunication 26carriers or 9-1-1 system service providers of   HB1866 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1telecommunication or other services under the Public Utilities 2Act.3    (d) For rules that implicate both the regulation of 9-1-1 4authorities under this Act and the regulation of 5telecommunication carriers and 9-1-1 system service providers 6under the Public Utilities Act, the Illinois State Police and 7the Commission may adopt joint rules necessary for 8implementation.9    (e) Any findings, orders, or decisions of the 10Administrator under this Section shall be deemed a final 11administrative decision and shall be subject to judicial 12review under the Administrative Review Law. 13(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 14102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 15    (50 ILCS 750/10.3)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)17    Sec. 10.3. Notice of address change. The Emergency 18Telephone System Board in any county maintaining implementing 19a 9-1-1 system that changes any person's address (when the 20person whose address has changed has not moved to a new 21residence) shall notify the person (i) of the person's new 22address and (ii) that the person should contact the local 23election authority to determine if the person should 24re-register to vote.25(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21.)   HB1866 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1    (50 ILCS 750/11.5)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)3    Sec. 11.5. Aggregator and originating service provider 4responsibilities.5    (a) Each aggregator, and the originating service providers 6whose 9-1-1 calls are being aggregated by the aggregator, 7shall comply with their respective requirements in 83 Ill. 8Adm. Code 725.410.9    (b) Beginning February 1, 2024 and every February 1 10thereafter, each aggregator that is operating within the State 11shall be notified 30 days in advance that the aggregator must 12submit the following information to the Office of the 13Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator that supports the implementation 14of and the migration and continuing operation of to the 15Statewide NG9-1-1 system to the Office of the Statewide 9-1-1 16Administrator on a form prescribed and made available by the 17Illinois State Police for this purpose:18        (1) A company 9-1-1 contact, address, email, and phone 19    number.20        (2) A list of originating service providers that the 21    aggregator transports 9-1-1 calls for and then to the 22    appropriate 9-1-1 system provider. New or current 23    aggregators must update the required information within 30 24    days of implementing any changes in information required 25    by this subsection.  HB1866 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1    Any aggregator that fails to provide the information 2required under this subsection shall be subject to a $100 3penalty for each month or portion of a month following the due 4date that the information is not provided. 5    (c) Each aggregator shall establish procedures for 6receiving No Record Found errors from the 9-1-1 System 7Provider, identifying the originating service provider who 8delivered the call to the aggregator, and referring the No 9Record Found errors to that originating service provider.10    (d) Each originating service provider shall establish 11procedures with the 9-1-1 system provider for preventing and 12resolving No Record Found errors in the 9-1-1 database and 13make every effort to ensure 9-1-1 calls are sent to the 14appropriate public safety answering point.15    (e) If a 9-1-1 system is being transitioned to NG9-1-1 16service or to a new provider, each aggregator shall be 17responsible for coordinating any modifications that are needed 18to ensure that the originating service provider provides the 19required level of service to its customers. Each aggregator 20shall coordinate those network changes or additions for those 21migrations in a timely manner with the appropriate 9-1-1 22system provider who shall be managing its respective 23implementation schedule and cut over. Each aggregator shall 24send notice to its originating service provider customers of 25the aggregator's successful turn up of the network changes or 26additions supporting the migration and include the necessary   HB1866 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1information for the originating service provider's migration 2(such as public safety answering point name, Federal 3Communications Commission Identification, and Emergency 4Services Routing Number). The notice shall be provided to the 5originating service providers within 2 weeks of acceptance 6testing and conversion activities between the aggregator and 7the 9-1-1 system provider.8    (f) The 9-1-1 system provider shall coordinate directly 9with the originating service providers (unless the aggregator 10separately agrees to coordinate with the originating service 11providers) for migration, but in no case shall that migration 12exceed 30 days after receipt of notice from the aggregator, 13unless agreed to by the originating service provider and 9-1-1 14system provider.15    (g) Each aggregator shall coordinate test calls with the 169-1-1 system provider and the 9-1-1 Authority when turning up 17new circuits or making network changes. Each originating 18service provider shall perform testing of its network and 19provisioning upon notification from the aggregator that the 20network has been tested and accepted with the 9-1-1 system 21provider.22    (h) Each aggregator and originating service provider 23customer shall deliver all 9-1-1 calls, audio, data, and 24location to the 9-1-1 system at a location determined by the 25State.26(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21;   HB1866 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1103-366, eff. 1-1-24.) 2    (50 ILCS 750/15.2)  (from Ch. 134, par. 45.2)3    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)4    Sec. 15.2. Any person who knowingly reports or is 5responsible for placing a call or text to the number "9-1-1 6911" or causing a transmission, in any manner, to a public 7safety agency or public safety answering point for the purpose 8of making an alarm or complaint and reporting false 9information or the alleged occurrence of a criminal act when, 10at the time the call, text, or transmission is made, the person 11knows there is no reasonable ground for making the call, text, 12or transmission and further knows that the call, text, or 13transmission alleges occurrence of a criminal act while 14knowing the act did not occur and could result in the emergency 15response of any public safety agency, is subject to the 16provisions of Section 26-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012.17(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 103-366, eff. 1-1-24.) 18    (50 ILCS 750/15.3)  (from Ch. 134, par. 45.3)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)20    Sec. 15.3. Local non-wireless, wireless, and advanced 21service surcharges surcharge.22    (a) The Except as provided in subsection (l) of this 23Section, the corporate authorities of any municipality with a 24population over 500,000 or any county may, subject to the   HB1866 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1limitations of subsection (a-5) subsections (c), (d), and (h), 2and in addition to any tax levied pursuant to the Simplified 3Municipal Telecommunications Tax Act, impose a monthly 4surcharge on billed subscribers for wireline, wireless and 5VoIP network connections of network connection provided by 6telecommunication carriers engaged in the business of 7transmitting messages by means of electricity originating 8within the corporate limits of the municipality or county 9imposing the surcharge at a rate per network connection 10determined in accordance with subsection (b). However, (c), 11however the monthly surcharge shall not apply to a network 12connection provided for use with pay telephone services, and 13if . Provided, however, that where multiple voice grade 14communications channels are connected between the subscriber's 15premises and a public switched network through private branch 16exchange (PBX) or Centrex centrex type service, a municipality 17imposing a surcharge at a rate per network connection, as 18determined in accordance with this Act, shall impose: 19        (1) (i) in a municipality with a population of over 20    500,000 or less or in any county, 5 such surcharges per 21    network connection, as of defined under Section 2 of this 22    Act, for both regular service and advanced service 23    provisioned trunk lines; (ii) in a municipality with a 24    population, prior to March 1, 2010, of over 500,000 or 25    more, 5 surcharges per network connection, as defined 26    under Section 2 of this Act, for both regular service and   HB1866 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1    advanced service provisioned voice paths or trunk lines; 2    (iii) in a municipality with a population, as of March 1, 3    2010, of 500,000 or more, 5 surcharges per network 4    connection, as defined under Section 2 of this Act, for 5    regular service provisioned trunk lines, and 12 surcharges 6    per network connection, as defined under Section 2 of this 7    Act, for advanced service provisioned voice paths or trunk 8    lines, except where an advanced service voice path or 9    provisioned trunk line supports at least 2 but fewer than 10    23 simultaneous voice grade calls ("VGC's"), a 11    telecommunication carrier may elect to impose fewer than 12    12 surcharges per voice path or trunk line as provided in 13    paragraph (2) subsection (iv) of this subsection Section; 14    or15        (2) (iv) for an advanced service provisioned voice 16    path or trunk line connected between the subscriber's 17    premises and the public switched network through a PBX 18    P.B.X., where the advanced service provisioned voice path 19    or trunk line is capable of transporting at least 2 but 20    fewer than 23 simultaneous VGC's per voice path or trunk 21    line, the telecommunications carrier collecting the 22    surcharge may elect to impose surcharges in accordance 23    with the table provided in this Section, without limiting 24    any telecommunications carrier's obligations to otherwise 25    keep and maintain records. Any telecommunications carrier 26    electing to impose fewer than 12 surcharges per an   HB1866 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1    advanced service provisioned voice path or trunk line 2    shall keep and maintain records adequately to demonstrate 3    the VGC capability of each advanced service provisioned 4    trunk line with fewer than 12 surcharges imposed, provided 5    that 12 surcharges shall be imposed on an advanced service 6    provisioned voice path or trunk line regardless of the VGC 7    capability where a telecommunications carrier cannot 8    demonstrate the VGC capability of the advanced service 9    provisioned voice path or trunk line.  10Facility VGC's 9-1-1 911 Surcharges 11Advanced service provisioned voice paths 12or trunk lines trunk line 18-23 12 9-1-1 Surcharges 13Advanced service provisioned voice paths 14or trunk lines trunk line 12-17 10 9-1-1 Surcharges 15Advanced service provisioned voice paths 16or trunk lines trunk line 2-11 8 9-1-1 Surcharges  17    Paragraphs (1) and (2) Subsections (i), (ii), (iii), and 18(iv) are not intended to make any change in the meaning of this 19Section, but are intended to remove possible ambiguity, 20thereby confirming the intent of subsection paragraph (a) as 21it existed prior to and following the effective date of this 22amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly. 23    (a-5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (a), a   HB1866 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1municipality with a population over 500,000 may not impose a 2monthly surcharge in excess of $5.00 per network connection. 3On or after January 1, 2029, a municipality with a population 4over 500,000 may not impose a monthly surcharge in excess of 5$2.50 per network connection.6    (a-10) In addition to any other lawful purpose, a 7municipality with a population over 500,000 may use the moneys 8collected under this Section for any anti-terrorism or 9emergency preparedness measures, including, but not limited 10to, preparedness planning, providing local matching funds for 11federal or State grants, personnel training, and specialized 12equipment, including surveillance cameras, as needed to deal 13with natural and terrorist-inspired emergency situations or 14events. 15    For mobile telecommunications services, if a surcharge is 16imposed it shall be imposed based upon the municipality or 17county that encompasses the customer's place of primary use as 18defined in the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Conformity 19Act. A municipality may enter into an intergovernmental 20agreement with any county in which it is partially located, 21when the county has adopted an ordinance to impose a surcharge 22as provided in subsection (c), to include that portion of the 23municipality lying outside the county in that county's 24surcharge referendum. If the county's surcharge referendum is 25approved, the portion of the municipality identified in the 26intergovernmental agreement shall automatically be   HB1866 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1disconnected from the county in which it lies and connected to 2the county which approved the referendum for purposes of a 3surcharge on telecommunications carriers.4    (b) For purposes of computing the surcharge imposed by 5subsection (a), the network connections to which the surcharge 6shall apply shall be those in-service network connections, 7other than those network connections assigned to the 8municipality or county, where the service address for each 9such network connection or connections is located within the 10corporate limits of the municipality or county levying the 11surcharge. Except for mobile telecommunication services, the 12"service address" shall mean the location of the primary use 13of the network connection or connections. For mobile 14telecommunication services, "service address" means the 15customer's place of primary use is used for the purposes of 16computing the surcharge as defined in the Mobile 17Telecommunications Sourcing Conformity Act.18    (c) (Blank). Upon the passage of an ordinance to impose a 19surcharge under this Section the clerk of the municipality or 20county shall certify the question of whether the surcharge may 21be imposed to the proper election authority who shall submit 22the public question to the electors of the municipality or 23county in accordance with the general election law; provided 24that such question shall not be submitted at a consolidated 25primary election. The public question shall be in 26substantially the following form:  HB1866 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1------------------------------------------------------------- 2Shall the county (or city, village 3or incorporated town) of ..... impose          YES 4a surcharge of up to ...¢ per month per 5network connection, which surcharge will 6be added to the monthly bill you receive   ------------------ 7for telephone or telecommunications 8charges, for the purpose of installing 9(or improving) a 9-1-1 Emergency               NO 10Telephone System? 11-------------------------------------------12    If a majority of the votes cast upon the public question 13are in favor thereof, the surcharge shall be imposed.14    However, if a Joint Emergency Telephone System Board is to 15be created pursuant to an intergovernmental agreement under 16Section 15.4, the ordinance to impose the surcharge shall be 17subject to the approval of a majority of the total number of 18votes cast upon the public question by the electors of all of 19the municipalities or counties, or combination thereof, that 20are parties to the intergovernmental agreement.21    The referendum requirement of this subsection (c) shall 22not apply to any municipality with a population over 500,000 23or to any county in which a proposition as to whether a 24sophisticated 9-1-1 Emergency Telephone System should be 25installed in the county, at a cost not to exceed a specified 26monthly amount per network connection, has previously been   HB1866 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1approved by a majority of the electors of the county voting on 2the proposition at an election conducted before the effective 3date of this amendatory Act of 1987.4    (d) (Blank). A county may not impose a surcharge, unless 5requested by a municipality, in any incorporated area which 6has previously approved a surcharge as provided in subsection 7(c) or in any incorporated area where the corporate 8authorities of the municipality have previously entered into a 9binding contract or letter of intent with a telecommunications 10carrier to provide sophisticated 9-1-1 service through 11municipal funds.12    (e) (Blank). A municipality or county may at any time by 13ordinance change the rate of the surcharge imposed under this 14Section if the new rate does not exceed the rate specified in 15the referendum held pursuant to subsection (c).16    (f) The surcharge authorized by this Section shall be 17collected from the subscriber by the telecommunications 18carrier providing the subscriber with the network connection 19as a separately stated item on the subscriber's bill.20    (g) The amount of surcharge collected by the 21telecommunications carrier shall be paid to the particular 22municipality or county or Joint Emergency Telephone System 23Board not later than 30 days after the surcharge is collected, 24net of any network or other 9-1-1 or sophisticated 9-1-1 25system charges then due to the particular telecommunications 26carrier, as shown on an itemized bill. The telecommunications   HB1866 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1carrier collecting the surcharge shall also be entitled to 2deduct 3% of the gross amount of surcharge collected to 3reimburse the telecommunications carrier for the expense of 4accounting and collecting the surcharge.5    (h) (Blank). Except as expressly provided in subsection 6(a) of this Section, on or after the effective date of this 7amendatory Act of the 98th General Assembly and until December 831, 2017, a municipality with a population of 500,000 or more 9shall not impose a monthly surcharge per network connection in 10excess of the highest monthly surcharge imposed as of January 111, 2014 by any county or municipality under subsection (c) of 12this Section. Beginning January 1, 2018 and until December 31, 132025, a municipality with a population over 500,000 may not 14impose a monthly surcharge in excess of $5.00 per network 15connection. On or after January 1, 2026, a municipality with a 16population over 500,000 may not impose a monthly surcharge in 17excess of $2.50 per network connection.18    (i) (Blank). Any municipality or county or joint emergency 19telephone system board that has imposed a surcharge pursuant 20to this Section prior to the effective date of this amendatory 21Act of 1990 shall hereafter impose the surcharge in accordance 22with subsection (b) of this Section.23    (j) (Blank). The corporate authorities of any municipality 24or county may issue, in accordance with Illinois law, bonds, 25notes or other obligations secured in whole or in part by the 26proceeds of the surcharge described in this Section. The State   HB1866 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1of Illinois pledges and agrees that it will not limit or alter 2the rights and powers vested in municipalities and counties by 3this Section to impose the surcharge so as to impair the terms 4of or affect the security for bonds, notes or other 5obligations secured in whole or in part with the proceeds of 6the surcharge described in this Section. The pledge and 7agreement set forth in this Section survive the termination of 8the surcharge under subsection (l) by virtue of the 9replacement of the surcharge monies guaranteed under Section 1020; the State of Illinois pledges and agrees that it will not 11limit or alter the rights vested in municipalities and 12counties to the surcharge replacement funds guaranteed under 13Section 20 so as to impair the terms of or affect the security 14for bonds, notes or other obligations secured in whole or in 15part with the proceeds of the surcharge described in this 16Section.17    (k) (Blank). Any surcharge collected by or imposed on a 18telecommunications carrier pursuant to this Section shall be 19held to be a special fund in trust for the municipality, county 20or Joint Emergency Telephone Board imposing the surcharge. 21Except for the 3% deduction provided in subsection (g) above, 22the special fund shall not be subject to the claims of 23creditors of the telecommunication carrier.24    (l) (Blank). Any surcharge imposed pursuant to this 25Section by a county or municipality, other than a municipality 26with a population in excess of 500,000, shall cease to be   HB1866 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1imposed on January 1, 2016.2(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 103-366, eff. 1-1-24.) 3    (50 ILCS 750/15.4)  (from Ch. 134, par. 45.4)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)5    Sec. 15.4. Emergency Telephone System Board; powers.6    (a) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this Section, 7the corporate authorities of any county or municipality may 8establish an Emergency Telephone System Board.9    (a-5) The corporate authorities shall provide for the 10manner of appointment and the number of members of the Board, 11provided that the board shall consist of not fewer than 5 12members, one of whom must be a public member who is a resident 13of the local exchange service territory included in the 9-1-1 14coverage area, one of whom (in counties with a population less 15than 100,000) may be a member of the county board, and at least 163 of whom shall be representative of the 9-1-1 public safety 17agencies, including but not limited to police departments, 18fire departments, emergency medical services providers, and 19emergency services and disaster agencies, and appointed on the 20basis of their ability or experience. In counties with a 21population of more than 100,000 but less than 2,000,000, a 22member of the county board may serve on the Emergency 23Telephone System Board. Elected officials, including county 24sheriffs and members of a county board, are also eligible to 25serve on the board. Members of the board shall serve without   HB1866 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1compensation but shall be reimbursed for their actual and 2necessary expenses. Any 2 or more municipalities, counties, or 3combination thereof, may, instead of establishing individual 4boards, establish by intergovernmental agreement a Joint 5Emergency Telephone System Board pursuant to this Section. The 6manner of appointment of such a joint board shall be 7prescribed in the agreement. A Joint ETSB created before the 8effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 9Assembly shall adopt and maintain bylaws for the governance 10and termination of the Joint ETSB within 6 months after the 11effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 12Assembly. A Joint ETSB created on or after the effective date 13of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly shall 14adopt and maintain bylaws for the governance and termination 15of the Joint ETSB within 6 months after the creation of the 16Joint ETSB. On or after the effective date of this amendatory 17Act of the 100th General Assembly, any new intergovernmental 18agreement entered into to establish or join a Joint Emergency 19Telephone System Board shall provide for the appointment of a 20PSAP representative to the board. 21    The corporate authorities of the county or municipality 22shall assign staggered terms to board members. Upon the 23effective date of this amendatory Act of the 98th General 24Assembly, appointed members of the Emergency Telephone System 25Board shall serve staggered 3-year terms if: (1) the Board 26serves a county with a population of 100,000 or less; and (2)   HB1866 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1appointments, on the effective date of this amendatory Act of 2the 98th General Assembly, are not for a stated term. The 3corporate authorities of the county or municipality shall 4assign terms to the board members serving on the effective 5date of this amendatory Act of the 98th General Assembly in the 6following manner: (1) one-third of board members' terms shall 7expire on January 1, 2015; (2) one-third of board members' 8terms shall expire on January 1, 2016; and (3) remaining board 9members' terms shall expire on January 1, 2017. Board members 10may be re-appointed upon the expiration of their terms by the 11corporate authorities of the county or municipality.12    The corporate authorities of a county or municipality may, 13by a vote of the majority of the members elected, remove an 14Emergency Telephone System Board member for misconduct, 15official misconduct, or neglect of office. 16    (b) The powers and duties of the board shall be defined by 17ordinance of the municipality or county, or by 18intergovernmental agreement in the case of a joint board. The 19powers and duties shall include, but need not be limited to the 20following:21        (1) Maintaining a NG9-1-1 Planning a 9-1-1 system.22        (2) Coordinating and supervising the implementation, 23    upgrading, or maintenance of the 9-1-1 system, including 24    the establishment of equipment specifications and coding 25    systems.26        (3) Receiving moneys from the surcharge imposed under   HB1866 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1    Section 15.3, or disbursed to it under Section 30, and 2    from any other source, for deposit into the Emergency 3    Telephone System Fund.4        (4) Authorizing all disbursements from the fund.5        (5) Hiring any staff necessary for the implementation 6    or upgrade and maintenance of the system.7        (6) (Blank).8        (7) Designating a 9-1-1 System Manager, whose duties 9    and responsibilities shall be set forth by the Emergency 10    Telephone System Board in writing.11    (c) All moneys received by a board pursuant to a surcharge 12imposed under Section 15.3, or disbursed to it under Section 1330, shall be deposited into a separate interest-bearing 14Emergency Telephone System Fund account. The treasurer of the 15municipality or county that has established the board or, in 16the case of a joint board, any municipal or county treasurer 17designated in the intergovernmental agreement, shall be 18custodian of the fund. All interest accruing on the fund shall 19remain in the fund. No expenditures may be made from such fund 20except upon the direction of the board by resolution passed by 21a majority of all members of the board.22    (d) The board shall complete and maintain a next 23generation Next Generation 9-1-1 GIS database in accordance 24with NENA Standards before implementation of the NG9-1-1 25system. The MSAG and GIS data standardization standardizing 26and synchronization must reach a 98% or greater match rate,   HB1866 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1with an option of matching with ALI, before using GIS data for 2NG9-1-1.3    (e) On and after January 1, 2016, no municipality or 4county may create an Emergency Telephone System Board unless 5the board is a Joint Emergency Telephone System Board. The 6corporate authorities of any county or municipality entering 7into an intergovernmental agreement to create or join a Joint 8Emergency Telephone System Board shall rescind an ordinance or 9ordinances creating a single Emergency Telephone System Board 10and shall eliminate the single Emergency Telephone System 11Board, effective upon the creation of the Joint Emergency 12Telephone System Board, with regulatory approval by the 13Administrator, or joining of the Joint Emergency Telephone 14System Board. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 15require the dissolution of an Emergency Telephone System Board 16that is not succeeded by a Joint Emergency Telephone System 17Board or is not required to consolidate under Section 15.4a of 18this Act. 19    (f) (Blank). Within one year after the effective date of 20this amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly, any 21corporate authorities of a county or municipality, other than 22a municipality with a population of more than 500,000, 23operating a 9-1-1 system without an Emergency Telephone System 24Board or Joint Emergency Telephone System Board shall create 25or join a Joint Emergency Telephone System Board. 26(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 103-366, eff. 1-1-24;   HB1866 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1103-693, eff. 1-1-25.) 2    (50 ILCS 750/15.4a)3    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)4    Sec. 15.4a. Consolidation.5    (a) By July 1, 2017, and except as otherwise provided in 6this Section, Emergency Telephone System Boards, Joint 7Emergency Telephone System Boards, and PSAPs shall be 8consolidated as follows, subject to subsections (b) and (c) of 9this Section: 10        (1) In any county with a population of at least 11    250,000 that has a single Emergency Telephone System Board 12    and more than 2 PSAPs, the 9-1-1 Authority shall reduce 13    the number of PSAPs by at least 50% or to 2 PSAPs, 14    whichever is greater. Nothing in this paragraph shall 15    preclude consolidation resulting in one PSAP in the 16    county.17        (2) In any county with a population of at least 18    250,000 that has more than one Emergency Telephone System 19    Board or Joint Emergency Telephone System Board, any 9-1-1 20    Authority serving a population of less than 25,000 shall 21    be consolidated such that no 9-1-1 Authority in the county 22    serves a population of less than 25,000.23        (3) In any county with a population of at least 24    250,000 but less than 1,000,000 that has more than one 25    Emergency Telephone System Board or Joint Emergency   HB1866 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1    Telephone System Board, each 9-1-1 Authority shall reduce 2    the number of PSAPs by at least 50% or to 2 PSAPs, 3    whichever is greater. Nothing in this paragraph shall 4    preclude consolidation of a 9-1-1 Authority into a Joint 5    Emergency Telephone System Board, and nothing in this 6    paragraph shall preclude consolidation resulting in one 7    PSAP in the county.8        (4) In any county with a population of less than 9    250,000 that has a single Emergency Telephone System Board 10    and more than 2 PSAPs, the 9-1-1 Authority shall reduce 11    the number of PSAPs by at least 50% or to 2 PSAPs, 12    whichever is greater. Nothing in this paragraph shall 13    preclude consolidation resulting in one PSAP in the 14    county.15        (5) (Blank). In any county with a population of less 16    than 250,000 that has more than one Emergency Telephone 17    System Board or Joint Emergency Telephone System Board and 18    more than 2 PSAPS, the 9-1-1 Authorities shall be 19    consolidated into a single joint board, and the number of 20    PSAPs shall be reduced by at least 50% or to 2 PSAPs, 21    whichever is greater. Nothing in this paragraph shall 22    preclude consolidation resulting in one PSAP in the 23    county.24        (6) (Blank). Any 9-1-1 Authority that does not have a 25    PSAP within its jurisdiction shall be consolidated through 26    an intergovernmental agreement with an existing 9-1-1   HB1866 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1    Authority that has a PSAP to create a Joint Emergency 2    Telephone Board.3        (7) (Blank). The corporate authorities of each county 4    that has no 9-1-1 service as of January 1, 2016 shall 5    provide 9-1-1 wireline and wireless 9-1-1 service for that 6    county by either (i) entering into an intergovernmental 7    agreement with an existing Emergency Telephone System 8    Board to create a new Joint Emergency Telephone System 9    Board, or (ii) entering into an intergovernmental 10    agreement with the corporate authorities that have created 11    an existing Joint Emergency Telephone System Board.12    (b) By July 1, 2016, each county required to consolidate 13pursuant to paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of this Section 14and each 9-1-1 Authority required to consolidate pursuant to 15paragraphs (1) through (6) of subsection (a) of this Section 16shall file a plan for consolidation or a request for a waiver 17pursuant to subsection (c) of this Section with the Office of 18the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator. 19        (1) No county or 9-1-1 Authority may avoid the 20    requirements of this Section by converting primary PSAPs 21    to secondary or virtual answering points; however, a PSAP 22    may be decommissioned. Staff from decommissioned PSAPs may 23    remain to perform nonemergency police, fire, or EMS 24    responsibilities. Any county or 9-1-1 Authority not in 25    compliance with this Section shall be ineligible to 26    receive consolidation grant funds issued under Section   HB1866 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1    15.4b of this Act or monthly disbursements otherwise due 2    under Section 30 of this Act, until the county or 9-1-1 3    Authority is in compliance. 4        (2) Within 60 calendar days of receiving a 5    consolidation plan or waiver, the Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory 6    Board shall hold at least one public hearing on the plan 7    and provide a recommendation to the Administrator. Notice 8    of the hearing shall be provided to the respective entity 9    to which the plan applies. If there are no contested 10    issues in the filing, then no public hearing shall be 11    warranted. 12        (3) Within 90 calendar days of receiving a 13    consolidation plan, the Administrator shall approve the 14    plan or waiver, approve the plan as modified, or grant a 15    waiver pursuant to subsection (c) of this Section. In 16    making his or her decision, the Administrator shall 17    consider any recommendation from the Statewide 9-1-1 18    Advisory Board regarding the plan. If the Administrator 19    does not follow the recommendation of the Board, the 20    Administrator shall provide a written explanation for the 21    deviation in his or her decision. 22        (4) The deadlines provided in this subsection may be 23    extended upon agreement between the Administrator and 24    entity which submitted the plan.25    (c) A waiver from a consolidation required under 26subsection (a) of this Section may be granted if the   HB1866 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1Administrator finds that the consolidation will result in a 2substantial threat to public safety, is economically 3unreasonable, or is technically infeasible.4    (d) Any decision of the Administrator under this Section 5shall be deemed a final administrative decision and shall be 6subject to judicial review under the Administrative Review 7Law.8(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 9    (50 ILCS 750/15.4b)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)11    Sec. 15.4b. Consolidation grants.12    (a) The Administrator, with the advice and recommendation 13of the Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board, shall administer a 149-1-1 System Consolidation Grant Program to defray costs 15associated with 9-1-1 system consolidation of systems outside 16of a municipality with a population in excess of 500,000. The 17awarded grants will be used to offset non-recurring costs 18associated with the consolidation of 9-1-1 systems and shall 19not be used for ongoing operating costs associated with the 20consolidated system. The Illinois State Police, in 21consultation with the Administrator and the Statewide 9-1-1 22Advisory Board, shall adopt rules defining the grant process 23and criteria for issuing the grants. The grants should be 24awarded based on criteria that include, but are not limited 25to:   HB1866 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1        (1) reducing the number of transfers of a 9-1-1 call;2        (2) reducing the infrastructure required to adequately 3    provide 9-1-1 network services;4        (3) promoting cost savings from resource sharing among 5    9-1-1 systems;6        (4) facilitating interoperability and resiliency for 7    the receipt of 9-1-1 calls;8        (5) reducing the number of 9-1-1 systems or reducing 9    the number of PSAPs within a 9-1-1 system;10        (6) cost saving resulting from 9-1-1 system 11    consolidation; and12        (7) expanding NG9-1-1 service coverage as a result of 13    9-1-1 system consolidation.14    Priority shall be given to first-time grant applicants 15first to counties not providing 9-1-1 service as of January 1, 162016, and next to other entities consolidating as required 17under Section 15.4a of this Act. 18    (b) The 9-1-1 System Consolidation Grant application, as 19defined by Illinois State Police rules, shall be submitted 20electronically using the State's grant management system by 21February 1, 2024 and every February 1 thereafter. The 22application shall include a modified 9-1-1 system plan as 23required by this Act in support of the consolidation plan. The 24Administrator shall have until June 30, 2016 and every June 30 25thereafter to approve 9-1-1 System Consolidation grants and 26modified 9-1-1 system plans. Payment requests for under the   HB1866 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1approved 9-1-1 System Consolidation grant applications grants 2shall be contingent upon an Order for an Application for 9-1-1 3Consolidation Plan the final approval of a modified 9-1-1 4system plan.5    (c) (Blank).6    (d) The 9-1-1 systems that receive grants under this 7Section shall provide a report detailing grant fund usage to 8the Administrator pursuant to Section 40 of this Act. 9(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-366, eff. 1-1-24.) 10    (50 ILCS 750/15.6b)11    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)12    Sec. 15.6b. Next generation Generation 9-1-1 service.     13    The Illinois State Police shall maintain a statewide next 14generation 9-1-1 network. (a) The Administrator, with the 15advice and recommendation of the Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory 16Board, shall develop and implement a plan for a statewide Next 17Generation 9-1-1 network. The next generation Next Generation 189-1-1 network must be an Internet protocol-based platform that 19at a minimum provides: 20        (1) improved 9-1-1 call delivery;21        (2) enhanced interoperability;22        (3) increased ease of communication between 9-1-1 23    service providers, allowing immediate transfer of 9-1-1 24    calls, caller information, photos, and other data 25    statewide;  HB1866 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1        (4) a hosted solution with redundancy built in; and2        (5) compliance with the most current NENA Standards.3    (b) By July 1, 2016, the Administrator, with the advice 4and recommendation of the Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board, 5shall design and issue a competitive request for a proposal to 6secure the services of a consultant to complete a feasibility 7study on the implementation of a statewide Next Generation 89-1-1 network in Illinois. By July 1, 2017, the consultant 9shall complete the feasibility study and make recommendations 10as to the appropriate procurement approach for developing a 11statewide Next Generation 9-1-1 network.12    (c) Within 12 months of the final report from the 13consultant under subsection (b) of this Section, the Illinois 14State Police shall procure and finalize a contract with a 15vendor certified under Section 13-900 of the Public Utilities 16Act to establish a statewide Next Generation 9-1-1 network. 17The Illinois State Police, in consultation with and subject to 18the approval of the Chief Procurement Officer, may procure a 19single contract or multiple contracts to implement the 20provisions of this Section. A contract or contracts under this 21subsection are not subject to the provisions of the Illinois 22Procurement Code, except for Sections 20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 2320-160 and Article 50 of that Code, provided that the Chief 24Procurement Officer may, in writing with justification, waive 25any certification required under Article 50 of the Illinois 26Procurement Code. This exemption is inoperative 2 years from   HB1866 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1June 3, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 102-9). Within 218 months of securing the contract, the vendor shall implement 3a Next Generation 9-1-1 network that allows 9-1-1 systems 4providing 9-1-1 service to Illinois residents to access the 5system utilizing their current infrastructure if it meets the 6standards adopted by the Illinois State Police.7(Source: P.A. 101-639, eff. 6-12-20; 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 8102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 9    (50 ILCS 750/15.9 new)10    Sec. 15.9. Configuration of Multi-line telephone systems.11    (a) An entity engaged in the business of installing, 12managing, or operating multi-line telephone systems in the 13State shall comply with applicable federal laws, including, 14but not limited to, 47 CFR 9.15 through 9.17 and Section 506 15RAY BAUM'S Act of 2018. The requirements apply to any 16multi-line telephone system that is manufactured, imported, 17offered for sale or lease, or first sold, leased, or installed 18after February 16, 2020. All multi-line telephone systems are 19required to dial 9-1-1 directly.20    (b) Alternative location information may be 21coordinate-based, and it must be sufficient to identify the 22caller's civic address and approximate in-building location, 23including floor level, in large buildings. 24    (50 ILCS 750/17.5)  HB1866 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)2    Sec. 17.5. Statewide 9-1-1 Call Directory.3    (a) The General Assembly finds the following:4        (1) Some 9-1-1 systems throughout this State do not 5    have a procedure in place to manually transfer 9-1-1 calls 6    originating within one 9-1-1 system's jurisdiction, but 7    which should properly be answered and dispatched by 8    another 9-1-1 system, to the appropriate 9-1-1 system for 9    answering and dispatching dispatch of first responders.10        (2) On January 1, 2016, the General Assembly gave 11    oversight authority of 9-1-1 systems to the Illinois State 12    Police.13        (3) Since that date, the Illinois State Police has 14    authorized individual 9-1-1 systems in counties and 15    municipalities to implement and upgrade 9-1-1 systems 16    throughout the State.17    (b) The Illinois State Police shall prepare a directory of 18all authorized 9-1-1 systems in the State. The directory shall 19include an emergency 24/7 10-digit telephone number for all 20primary public safety answering points located in each 9-1-1 21system to which 9-1-1 calls from another jurisdiction can be 22transferred. This directory shall be made available to each 239-1-1 authority for its use in establishing standard operating 24procedures regarding calls outside its 9-1-1 jurisdiction.25    (c) Each 9-1-1 system shall provide the Illinois State 26Police with the following information:  HB1866 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1        (1) The name of the PSAP, a list of every 2    participating agency, and the county the PSAP is in, 3    including college and university public safety entities.4        (2) The 24/7 10-digit emergency telephone number for 5    the dispatch agency to which 9-1-1 calls originating in 6    another 9-1-1 jurisdiction can be transferred to exchange 7    information. The emergency telephone number must be a 8    direct line that is not answered by an automated system 9    but rather is answered by a person. Each 9-1-1 system 10    shall provide the Illinois State Police with any changes 11    to the participating agencies and this number immediately 12    upon the change occurring. Each 9-1-1 system shall provide 13    the PSAP information and the 24/7 10-digit emergency 14    telephone number within 30 days of June 3, 2021 (the 15    effective date of Public Act 102-9).16        (3) The standard operating procedure describing the 17    manner in which the 9-1-1 system will transfer 9-1-1 calls 18    originating within its jurisdiction, but which should 19    properly be answered and dispatched by another 9-1-1 20    system, to the appropriate 9-1-1 system. Each 9-1-1 system 21    shall provide the standard operating procedures to the 22    Manager of the Illinois State Police's 9-1-1 Program 23    within 180 days after July 1, 2017 (the effective date of 24    Public Act 100-20). 25    (d) Unless exigent circumstances dictate otherwise, each 269-1-1 system's public safety telecommunicators shall be   HB1866 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1responsible for remaining on the line with the caller when a 29-1-1 call originates within its jurisdiction to ensure the 39-1-1 call is transferred to the appropriate authorized entity 4for answer and dispatch until a public safety telecommunicator 5is on the line and confirms jurisdiction for the call. 6(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 7102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 8    (50 ILCS 750/19)9    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)10    Sec. 19. Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board.11    (a) Beginning July 1, 2015, there is created the Statewide 129-1-1 Advisory Board within the Illinois State Police. The 13Board shall consist of the following voting members:14        (1) The Director of the Illinois State Police, or his 15    or her designee, who shall serve as chairman.16        (2) The Executive Director of the Commission, or his 17    or her designee.18        (3) Members appointed by the Governor as follows:19            (A) one member representing the Illinois chapter 20        of the National Emergency Number Association, or his 21        or her designee;22            (B) one member representing the Illinois chapter 23        of the Association of Public-Safety Communications 24        Officials, or his or her designee;25            (C) one member representing a county 9-1-1 system   HB1866 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1        from a county with a population of less than 37,000;2            (C-5) one member representing a county 9-1-1 3        system from a county with a population between 37,000 4        and 100,000; 5            (D) one member representing a county 9-1-1 system 6        from a county with a population between 100,001 and 7        250,000;8            (E) one member representing a county 9-1-1 system 9        from a county with a population of more than 250,000;10            (F) one member representing a municipal or 11        intergovernmental cooperative 9-1-1 system, excluding 12        any single municipality with a population over 13        500,000;14            (G) one member representing the Illinois 15        Association of Chiefs of Police;16            (H) one member representing the Illinois Sheriffs' 17        Association; and18            (I) one member representing the Illinois Fire 19        Chiefs Association.20    The Governor shall appoint the following non-voting 21members: (i) one member representing an incumbent local 22exchange 9-1-1 system provider; (ii) one member representing a 23non-incumbent local exchange 9-1-1 system provider; (iii) one 24member representing a large wireless carrier; (iv) one member 25representing an incumbent local exchange carrier; (v) one 26member representing the Illinois Broadband and   HB1866 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1Telecommunications Association; (vi) one member representing 2the Illinois Broadband and Cable Association; and (vii) one 3member representing the Illinois State Ambulance Association. 4The Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Minority 5Leader of the House of Representatives, the President of the 6Senate, and the Minority Leader of the Senate may each appoint 7a member of the General Assembly to temporarily serve as a 8non-voting member of the Board during the 12 months prior to 9the repeal date of this Act to discuss legislative initiatives 10of the Board. 11    (b) The Governor shall make initial appointments to the 12Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board by August 31, 2015. Six of the 13voting members appointed by the Governor shall serve an 14initial term of 2 years, and the remaining voting members 15appointed by the Governor shall serve an initial term of 3 16years. Thereafter, each appointment by the Governor shall be 17for a term of 3 years and until their respective successors are 18appointed. Non-voting members shall serve for a term of 3 19years. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the 20original appointment. Persons appointed to fill a vacancy 21shall serve for the balance of the unexpired term.22    Members of the Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board shall serve 23without compensation.24    (c) The 9-1-1 Services Advisory Board, as constituted on 25June 1, 2015, without the legislative members, shall serve in 26the role of the Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board until all   HB1866 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1appointments of voting members have been made by the Governor 2under subsection (a) of this Section.3    (d) The Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board shall:4        (1) advise the Illinois State Police and the Statewide 5    9-1-1 Administrator on the oversight of 9-1-1 systems and 6    the development and implementation of a uniform statewide 7    9-1-1 system;8        (2) make recommendations to the Governor and the 9    General Assembly regarding improvements to 9-1-1 services 10    throughout the State; and11        (3) exercise all other powers and duties provided in 12    this Act.13    (e) The Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board shall submit to the 14General Assembly a report, by April March 1 of each year, that 15provides providing an update on the state of transition to a 16statewide 9-1-1, 9-1-1 statistics, system and recommendations 17for recommending any legislative actions action.18    (f) The Illinois State Police shall provide administrative 19support to the Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board. 20(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 21102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-564, eff. 11-17-23.) 22    (50 ILCS 750/20)23    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)24    Sec. 20. Statewide surcharge.25    (a) On and after January 1, 2016, and except with respect   HB1866 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1to those customers who are subject to surcharges as provided 2in Section Sections 15.3 and 15.3a of this Act, a monthly 3surcharge shall be imposed on all customers of 4telecommunications carriers and wireless carriers as follows:5        (1) Each telecommunications carrier shall impose a 6    monthly surcharge per network connection; provided, 7    however, the monthly surcharge shall not apply to a 8    network connection provided for use with pay telephone 9    services. Where multiple voice grade communications 10    channels are connected between the subscriber's premises 11    and a public switched network through private branch 12    exchange (PBX), Centrex type service, or other multiple 13    voice grade communication channels facility, there shall 14    be imposed 5 such surcharges per network connection for 15    both regular service and advanced service provisioned 16    trunk lines. Until December 31, 2017, the surcharge shall 17    be $0.87 per network connection and on and after January 18    1, 2018, the surcharge shall be $1.50 per network 19    connection.20        (1.5) For an advanced service, the surcharge is based 21    on the number of concurrent voice paths. As used in this 22    paragraph, "concurrent voice paths or trunk lines" means 23    the largest number of calls that can dial to 9-1-1 from a 24    single location. The telecommunications carrier collecting 25    the surcharge shall impose surcharges in accordance with 26    the table provided in this Section, without limiting any   HB1866 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1    telecommunications carrier's obligations to otherwise keep 2    and maintain records. Any telecommunications carrier 3    electing to impose fewer than 5 surcharges per advanced 4    service provisioned path or shall keep and maintain 5    records adequately to demonstrate the VGC capability of 6    each advanced service provisioned path or with fewer than 7    5 surcharges imposed, provided that 20 surcharges shall be 8    imposed on an advanced service provisioned voice paths or 9    trunk lines regardless of the VGC capability where a 10    telecommunications carrier cannot demonstrate the VGC 11    capability of the advanced service provisioned voice paths 12    or trunk lines. The VGC 9-1-1 surcharges shall be assessed 13    as follows: 14            (A) for up to 10 VGC voice paths or trunk lines, no 15        more than 5 surcharges;16            (B) for up to 50 VGC voice paths or trunk lines, no 17        more than 20 surcharges; and18            (C) for over 50 VGC voice patch or trunk lines, no 19        more than 20% of the lines that have surcharges. 20        (2) (Blank). Each wireless carrier shall impose and 21    collect a monthly surcharge per CMRS connection that 22    either has a telephone number within an area code assigned 23    to Illinois by the North American Numbering Plan 24    Administrator or has a billing address in this State. 25    Until December 31, 2017, the surcharge shall be $0.87 per 26    connection and on and after January 1, 2018, the surcharge   HB1866 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1    shall be $1.50 per connection.2    (a-5) For purposes of computing the surcharge imposed by 3this Section, the network connections to which the surcharge 4shall apply shall be those in-service network connections, 5other than those network connections assigned to the 6municipality or county, where the service address for each 7network connection is located within the corporate limits of 8the State levying the surcharge. Except for mobile 9telecommunication services, the "service address" shall mean 10the location of the primary use of the network connection or 11connections. For mobile telecommunication services, "service 12address" means the customer's place of primary use as defined 13in the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Conformity Act. 14    (b) (Blank). State and local taxes shall not apply to the 15surcharges imposed under this Section.16    (b-5) The surcharges imposed by this Section shall be 17stated as separate items on subscriber bills.18    (b-10) The telecommunications carrier collecting the 19surcharge may deduct and retain 1.74% of the gross amount of 20surcharge collected in order to reimburse the 21telecommunications carrier for the expense of accounting and 22collecting the surcharge. 23    (c) The surcharges authorized imposed by this Section 24shall be collected from the subscriber by the 25telecommunications carrier providing the subscriber with the 26network connection as stated as a separately stated item on   HB1866 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1the subscriber's bill subscriber bills.2    (d) The amount of the surcharge collected by the 3telecommunications carrier shall be paid to the State not 4later than 30 days after the surcharge is collected, net of any 5network or other 9-1-1 or sophisticated 9-1-1 system charges 6then due the particular telecommunications carrier, as shown 7on an itemized bill. The telecommunications carrier collecting 8the surcharge shall also be entitled to may deduct and retain 91.74% of the gross amount of the surcharge collected in order 10to reimburse the telecommunications carrier for the expense of 11accounting and collecting the surcharge. 12    Each wireless carrier shall impose and collect a monthly 13surcharge per CMRS connection that has a telephone number with 14a primary place of use within this State. After January 1, 152018, the surcharge shall be $1.50 per connection.16     On and after July 1, 2022, the wireless carrier 17collecting a surcharge under this Section may deduct and 18retain 1.74% of the gross amount of the surcharge collected to 19reimburse the wireless carrier for the expense of accounting 20and collecting the surcharge.21    (d-5) (Blank). Notwithstanding the provisions of 22subsection (d) of this Section, an amount not greater than 232.5% may be deducted and retained if the telecommunications or 24wireless carrier can support, through documentation, expenses 25that exceed the 1.74% allowed. The documentation shall be 26submitted to the Illinois State Police and input obtained from   HB1866 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1the Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board prior to approval of the 2deduction.3    (e) Surcharges imposed under this Section shall be 4collected by the carriers and shall be remitted to the 5Illinois State Police by the payment method set by the 6Illinois State Treasurer's Office. All payments less than 7$100,000 must be made electronically per the instructions 8given by the Illinois State Treasurer's Office and the 9Illinois State Police. Surcharge payments are due , either by 10check or electronic funds transfer, by the end of the next 11calendar month after the calendar month in which they were it 12was collected for deposit into the Statewide 9-1-1 Fund. 13Carriers are not required to remit surcharges surcharge that 14are billed to subscribers but not yet collected. Monthly 15remittances by wireless carriers shall include the number of 16subscribers by 5-digit zip code. A carrier that fails to 17provide the zip code information required under this 18subsection (e) shall be subject to the penalty set forth in 19subsection (g) of this Section moneys that are billed to 20subscribers but not yet collected.21    (e-5) The first remittance by wireless carriers shall 22include the number of subscribers by zip code, and the 5-digit 239-digit zip code and if currently being used or later 24implemented by the carrier, that shall be the means by which 25the Illinois State Police determines shall determine 26distributions from the Statewide 9-1-1 Fund. This information   HB1866 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1shall be updated monthly based on the subscriber's PPU and 2should not be a post office box at least once each year. Any 3carrier that fails to provide the zip code information 4required under this subsection (e) shall be subject to the 5penalty set forth in subsection (g) of this Section.6    (f) If, within 8 calendar days after it is due under 7subsection (e) of this Section, a carrier does not remit the 8surcharge or any portion thereof required under this Section, 9then the surcharge or portion thereof shall be deemed 10delinquent until paid in full, and the Illinois State Police 11may impose a penalty against the carrier in an amount equal to 12the greater of:13        (1) $25 for each month or portion of a month from the 14    time an amount becomes delinquent until the amount is paid 15    in full; or16        (2) an amount equal to the product of 1% and the sum of 17    all delinquent amounts for each month or portion of a 18    month that the delinquent amounts remain unpaid.19    A penalty imposed in accordance with this subsection (f) 20for a portion of a month during which the carrier pays the 21delinquent amount in full shall be prorated for each day of 22that month that the delinquent amount was paid in full. Any 23penalty imposed under this subsection (f) is in addition to 24the amount of the delinquency and is in addition to any other 25penalty imposed under this Section.26    (g) If, within 8 calendar days after it is due, a wireless   HB1866 Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1carrier does not provide the number of subscribers by zip code 2as required under subsection (e) of this Section, then the 3report is deemed delinquent and the Illinois State Police may 4impose a penalty against the carrier in an amount equal to the 5greater of:6        (1) $25 for each month or portion of a month that the 7    report is delinquent; or8        (2) an amount equal to the product of $0.01 and the 9    number of subscribers served by the carrier for each month 10    or portion of a month that the delinquent report is not 11    provided.12    A penalty imposed in accordance with this subsection (g) 13for a portion of a month during which the carrier provides the 14number of subscribers by zip code as required under subsection 15(e) of this Section shall be prorated for each day of that 16month during which the carrier had not provided the number of 17subscribers by zip code as required under subsection (e) of 18this Section. Any penalty imposed under this subsection (g) is 19in addition to any other penalty imposed under this Section.20    (h) A penalty imposed and collected in accordance with 21subsection (f) or (g) of this Section shall be deposited into 22the Statewide 9-1-1 Fund for distribution according to Section 2330 of this Act.24    (i) The Illinois State Police may enforce the collection 25of any delinquent amount and any penalty due and unpaid under 26this Section by legal action or in any other manner by which   HB1866 Enrolled- 70 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1the collection of debts due the State of Illinois may be 2enforced under the laws of this State. The Illinois State 3Police may excuse the payment of any penalty imposed under 4this Section if the Administrator determines that the 5enforcement of this penalty is unjust.6    (j) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 7nothing shall impair the right of wireless carriers to recover 8unreimbursed compliance costs for all emergency communications 9services directly from their wireless subscribers by line-item 10charges on the wireless subscriber's bill. Those compliance 11costs include all costs incurred by wireless carriers in 12complying with local, State, and federal regulatory or 13legislative mandates that require the transmission and receipt 14of emergency communications to and from the general public, 15including, but not limited to, NG9-1-1 E9-1-1. 16(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 17102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-366, eff. 1-1-24.) 18    (50 ILCS 750/30)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)20    Sec. 30. Statewide 9-1-1 Fund; surcharge disbursement.21    (a) Moneys deposited into the Statewide 9-1-1 Fund may be 22used only for purposes or functions set forth in Section 35. 23The direct distribution of funds from the Statewide 9-1-1 Fund 24to a municipality is prohibited. The moneys deposited into the 25Statewide 9-1-1 Fund under this Section shall not be subject   HB1866 Enrolled- 71 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1to administrative charges or chargebacks unless otherwise 2authorized by this Act. A special fund in the State treasury 3known as the Wireless Service Emergency Fund shall be renamed 4the Statewide 9-1-1 Fund. Any appropriations made from the 5Wireless Service Emergency Fund shall be payable from the 6Statewide 9-1-1 Fund. The Statewide 9-1-1 Fund shall consist 7of the following:8        (1) (Blank).9        (2) 9-1-1 surcharges assessed under Section 20 of this 10    Act.11        (3) Prepaid wireless 9-1-1 surcharges assessed under 12    Section 15 of the Prepaid Wireless 9-1-1 Surcharge Act.13        (4) Any appropriations, grants, or gifts made to the 14    Fund.15        (5) Any income from interest, premiums, gains, or 16    other earnings on moneys in the Fund.17        (6) Money from any other source that is deposited in 18    or transferred to the Fund. 19    (b) Subject to appropriation and availability of funds, 20the Illinois State Police shall distribute the 9-1-1 21surcharges monthly as follows:22        (1) From each surcharge collected and remitted under 23    Section 20 of this Act:24            (A) $0.013 shall be distributed monthly in equal 25        amounts to each County Emergency Telephone System 26        Board in counties with a population under 100,000,   HB1866 Enrolled- 72 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1        including counties that are members of a joint ETSB 2        and counties that are not members of a joint ETSB, 3        according to the most recent census data which is 4        authorized to serve as a primary wireless 9-1-1 public 5        safety answering point for the county and to provide 6        wireless 9-1-1 service as prescribed by subsection (b) 7        of Section 15.6a of this Act, and which does provide 8        such service.9            (B) (Blank).10            (C) Until December 31, 2017, $0.007 and on and 11        after January 1, 2018, $0.017 shall be used to cover 12        the Illinois State Police's administrative costs.13            (D) (Blank). Beginning January 1, 2018, until June 14        30, 2020, $0.12, and on and after July 1, 2020, $0.04 15        shall be used to make monthly disbursements to the 16        appropriate 9-1-1 Authority currently taking wireless 17        9-1-1 based upon the United States Postal Zip Code of 18        the billing addresses of subscribers wireless 19        carriers.20            (E) Until June 30, 2028 2025, $0.05 shall be used 21        by the Illinois State Police for grants for NG9-1-1 22        expenses, with priority given to 9-1-1 Authorities 23        that provide 9-1-1 service within the territory of a 24        Large Electing Provider as defined in Section 13-406.1 25        of the Public Utilities Act. Grant project priorities 26        shall be determined by the Administrator with the   HB1866 Enrolled- 73 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1        advice of the Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board. NG9-1-1 2        grant funds not obligated to an award for an NG9-1-1 3        grant expense shall be distributed to the 9-1-1 4        authorities in accordance with subparagraph (E) of 5        paragraph (2) on an annual basis at the end of the 6        State fiscal year. 7            (F) On and after July 1, 2020, $0.13 shall be used 8        for the implementation, maintenance, and upgrades to 9        of and continuing expenses for the Statewide NG9-1-1 10        system. 11        (1.5) Beginning on the effective date of this 12    amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly, to assist 13    with the implementation of the statewide next generation 14    Next Generation 9-1-1 network, the Illinois State Police's 15    administrative costs include the one-time capital cost of 16    upgrading the Illinois State Police's call-handling 17    equipment to meet the standards necessary to access and 18    increase interoperability with the statewide next 19    generation Next Generation 9-1-1 network.20            (A) Upon completion of the Illinois State Police's 21        call-handling equipment upgrades, but no later than 22        June 30, 2024, surplus moneys in excess of $1,000,000 23        from subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) not utilized by 24        the Illinois State Police for administrative costs 25        shall be distributed to the 9-1-1 Authorities in 26        accordance with subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) on   HB1866 Enrolled- 74 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1        an annual basis at the end of the State fiscal year. 2        Any remaining surplus money may also be distributed 3        consistent with this paragraph (1.5) at the discretion 4        of the Illinois State Police.5            (B) Upon implementation of the Statewide NG9-1-1 6        system, but no later than June 30, 2024, surplus 7        moneys in excess of $5,000,000 from subparagraph (F) 8        of paragraph (1) not utilized by the Illinois State 9        Police for the maintenance implementation of and 10        upgrades to continuing expenses for the Statewide 11        NG9-1-1 system shall be distributed to the 9-1-1 12        Authorities in accordance with subparagraph (E) of 13        subsection (2) on an annual basis at the end of the 14        State fiscal year. Any remaining surplus money may 15        also be distributed consistent with this paragraph 16        (1.5) at the discretion of the Illinois State Police. 17        (2) After disbursements under paragraph (1) of this 18    subsection (b), all remaining funds in the Statewide 9-1-1 19    Fund shall be disbursed in the following priority order: 20            (A) The Fund shall pay monthly to: 21            (i) the 9-1-1 Authorities that imposed surcharges 22        under Section 20 15.3 of this Act and were required to 23        report to the Illinois Commerce Commission under 24        Section 27 of the Wireless Emergency Telephone Safety 25        Act on October 1, 2014, except a 9-1-1 Authority in a 26        municipality with a population in excess of 500,000,   HB1866 Enrolled- 75 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1        an amount equal to the average monthly wireline and 2        VoIP surcharge revenue attributable to the most recent 3        12-month period reported to the Illinois State Police 4        under that Section for the October 1, 2014 filing, 5        subject to the power of the Illinois State Police to 6        investigate the amount reported and adjust the number 7        by order under Article X of the Public Utilities Act, 8        so that the monthly amount paid under this item 9        accurately reflects one-twelfth of the aggregate 10        wireline and VoIP surcharge revenue properly 11        attributable to the most recent 12-month period 12        reported to the Commission; or 13                (ii) county qualified governmental entities 14            that did not impose a surcharge under Section 15.3 15            as of December 31, 2015, and counties that did not 16            impose a surcharge as of June 30, 2015, an amount 17            equivalent to their population multiplied by .37 18            multiplied by the rate of $0.69; counties that are 19            not county qualified governmental entities and 20            that did not impose a surcharge as of December 31, 21            2015, shall not begin to receive the payment 22            provided for in this subsection until NG9-1-1 23            E9-1-1 and wireless E9-1-1 services are provided 24            within their counties; or 25                (iii) counties without 9-1-1 service that had 26            a surcharge in place by December 31, 2015, an   HB1866 Enrolled- 76 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1            amount equivalent to their population multiplied 2            by .37 multiplied by their surcharge rate as 3            established by the referendum. 4            (B) All 9-1-1 network costs for systems outside of 5        municipalities with a population of less than of at 6        least 500,000 shall be paid by the Illinois State 7        Police Statewide 9-1-1 Bureau directly to the vendors.8            (C) All expenses incurred by the Administrator and 9        the Statewide 9-1-1 Advisory Board and costs 10        associated with procurement under Section 15.6b 11        including requests for information and requests for 12        proposals.13            (D) Funds may be held in reserve by the Statewide 14        9-1-1 Advisory Board and disbursed by the Illinois 15        State Police for grants under Section 15.4b of this 16        Act and for NG9-1-1 expenses up to $12.5 million per 17        year in State fiscal years 2016 and 2017; up to $20 18        million in State fiscal year 2018; up to $20.9 million 19        in State fiscal year 2019; up to $15.3 million in State 20        fiscal year 2020; up to $16.2 million in State fiscal 21        year 2021; up to $23.1 million in State fiscal year 22        2022; and up to $17.0 million per year for State fiscal 23        year 2023 and each year thereafter. The amount held in 24        reserve in State fiscal years 2021, 2022, and 2023 25        shall not be less than $6.5 million. Disbursements 26        under this subparagraph (D) shall be prioritized as   HB1866 Enrolled- 77 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1        follows: (i) consolidation grants prioritized under 2        subsection (a) of Section 15.4b of this Act; (ii) 3        NG9-1-1 expenses; and (iii) consolidation grants under 4        Section 15.4b of this Act for consolidation expenses 5        incurred between January 1, 2010, and January 1, 2016. 6            (E) All remaining funds per remit month shall be 7        used to make monthly disbursements to the appropriate 8        9-1-1 Authority currently taking wireless 9-1-1 based 9        upon the United States Postal Zip Code of the primary 10        place billing addresses of use for subscribers of 11        wireless carriers. 12    (c) (Blank). The moneys deposited into the Statewide 9-1-1 13Fund under this Section shall not be subject to administrative 14charges or chargebacks unless otherwise authorized by this 15Act.16    (d) Whenever two or more 9-1-1 Authorities consolidate, 17the resulting Joint Emergency Telephone System Board shall be 18entitled to the monthly payments that had theretofore been 19made to each consolidating 9-1-1 Authority. Any reserves held 20by any consolidating 9-1-1 Authority shall be transferred to 21the resulting Joint Emergency Telephone System Board. The 22Illinois State Police shall make a single payment for each 239-1-1 Authority for each of the disbursements required under 24this Section consistent with the provisions of this Act. If a 259-1-1 Authority fails to meet the requirements of this Act for 26next generation 9-1-1 (i3) and text to 9-1-1 due dates, or does   HB1866 Enrolled- 78 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1not submit the required NG9-1-1 GIS data to support geospatial 2routing of 9-1-1 calls in accordance with the published update 3schedule, then 5% of the 9-1-1 Authority monthly surcharge 4distribution will be held provided that notice is given each 5month until the 9-1-1 Authority achieves compliance. After 3 6months, a surcharge that has been held shall be forfeited one 7month at a time until full compliance is achieved, and the 89-1-1 Authority shall not be eligible for future surcharge 9distributions or other State funding until all conditions are 10met. A 9-1-1 Authority may request a waiver if the 9-1-1 11Authority has exhausted all avenues to meet the requirements 12of this Act. The forfeited funds shall be redistributed to 139-1-1 Authorities in accordance with subparagraph (E) of 14paragraph (2) of Section 30 on an annual basis at the end of 15the State's fiscal year. Whenever a county that has no 9-1-1 16service as of January 1, 2016 enters into an agreement to 17consolidate to create or join a Joint Emergency Telephone 18System Board, the Joint Emergency Telephone System Board shall 19be entitled to the monthly payments that would have otherwise 20been paid to the county if it had provided 9-1-1 service.21(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 22102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-366, eff. 1-1-24; 103-564, eff. 2311-17-23.) 24    (50 ILCS 750/35)25    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)  HB1866 Enrolled- 79 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1    Sec. 35. 9-1-1 surcharge; acceptable allowable 2expenditures. 3    (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, expenditures 4from surcharge revenues received under this Act shall be made 5consistent with 47 CFR 9.23, which include the following:6        (1) support and implementation of 9-1-1 services 7    provided by or in the State or taxing jurisdiction 8    imposing the fee or charge; and9        (2) operational expenses of public safety answering 10    points within the State. Examples of acceptable allowable 11    expenditures include, but are not limited to:12            (A) PSAP operating costs, including lease, 13        purchase, maintenance, replacement, and upgrade of 14        customer premises equipment (hardware and software), 15        CAD equipment (hardware and software), and the PSAP 16        building and facility and including NG9-1-1, 17        cybersecurity, pre-arrival instructions, and emergency 18        notification systems. PSAP operating costs include 19        technological innovation that supports 9-1-1;20            (B) PSAP personnel costs, including 21        telecommunicators' salaries and training;22            (C) PSAP administration, including costs for 23        administration of 9-1-1 services and travel expenses 24        associated with the provision of 9-1-1 services;25            (D) integrating public safety and first responder 26        dispatch and 9-1-1 systems, including lease, purchase,   HB1866 Enrolled- 80 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1        maintenance, and upgrade of CAD equipment (hardware 2        and software) to support integrated 9-1-1 and public 3        safety dispatch operations; 4            (E) providing the interoperability of 9-1-1 5        systems with one another and with public safety and 6        first responder radio systems; and7            (F) costs for the initial acquisition and 8        installation of road or street signs that are 9        essential to the implementation of the Emergency 10        Telephone System and that are not duplicative of signs 11        that are the responsibility of the jurisdiction 12        charged with maintaining road and street signs, as 13        well as costs incurred to reimburse governmental 14        bodies for the acquisition and installation of those 15        signs, except that expenditures may not be used for 16        ongoing expenses associated with sign maintenance and 17        replacement. 18        (3) (Blank).19        (4) (Blank).20        (5) (Blank).21        (6) (Blank). 22        (7) (Blank).23        (8) (Blank).24        (9) (Blank).25        (10) (Blank). 26    (b) The obligation or expenditure of surcharge revenues   HB1866 Enrolled- 81 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1received under this Act for a purpose or function inconsistent 2with 47 CFR 9.23 and this Section shall constitute diversion, 3which undermines the purpose of this Act by depriving the 49-1-1 system of the funds it needs to function effectively and 5to modernize 9-1-1 operations. Examples of diversion include, 6but are not limited to:7        (1) transfer of 9-1-1 fees into a State or other 8    jurisdiction's general fund or other fund for non-9-1-1 9    purposes;10        (2) use of surcharge revenues for equipment or 11    infrastructure for constructing or expanding 12    non-public-safety communications networks (e.g., 13    commercial cellular networks); and14        (3) use of surcharge revenues for equipment or 15    infrastructure for law enforcement, firefighters, and 16    other public safety or first responder entities that do 17    does not directly support providing 9-1-1 services. 18    (c) In the case of a municipality with a population over 19500,000, moneys may also be used for any anti-terrorism or 20emergency preparedness measures, including, but not limited 21to, preparedness planning, providing local matching funds for 22federal or State grants, personnel training, and specialized 23equipment, including surveillance cameras, as needed to deal 24with natural and terrorist-inspired emergency situations or 25events. 26(Source: P.A. 103-366, eff. 1-1-24; 103-564, eff. 11-17-23.)   HB1866 Enrolled- 82 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1    (50 ILCS 750/40)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)3    Sec. 40. Financial reports.4    (a) The Illinois State Police shall create uniform 5accounting procedures for the making of reports under this Act 6, with such modification as may be required to give effect to 7statutory provisions applicable only to municipalities with a 8population in excess of 500,000, that any emergency telephone 9system board receiving surcharge money pursuant to Section 1015.3, 15.3a, or 30 of this Act must follow.11    (b) By January 31, 2018, and every January 31 thereafter, 12each emergency telephone system board receiving surcharge 13money pursuant to Section 15.3, 15.3a, or 30 shall report to 14the Illinois State Police audited financial statements showing 15total revenue and expenditures for the period beginning with 16the end of the period covered by the last submitted report 17through the end of the previous calendar year in a form and 18manner as prescribed by the Illinois State Police. Such 19financial information shall include: 20        (1) a detailed summary of revenue from all sources 21    including, but not limited to, local, State, federal, and 22    private revenues, and any other funds received and shall 23    be based on the audited financials from the audit of 24    outside firms, including the audit of the ETSB's surcharge 25    fund;  HB1866 Enrolled- 83 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1        (2) all expenditures made during the reporting period 2    from distributions under this Act;3        (3) call data and statistics, when available, from the 4    reporting period, as specified by the Illinois State 5    Police and collected in accordance with any reporting 6    method established or required by the Illinois State 7    Police;8        (4) all costs associated with dispatching appropriate 9    public safety agencies to respond to 9-1-1 calls received 10    by the PSAP; and11        (5) all funding sources and amounts of funding used 12    for costs described in paragraph (4) of this subsection 13    (b). 14    The ETSB emergency telephone system board is responsible 15for any costs associated with auditing such financial 16statements. The Illinois State Police may request copies of 17the audited financial statements for those statements that 18include the ETSB's surcharge fund. The Illinois State Police 19shall post annual financial reports on the Illinois State 20Police's website. 21    (c) Along with its annual financial report audited 22financial statement, each emergency telephone system board 23receiving a grant under Section 15.4b or Section 30 of this Act 24shall include a report on of the amount of grant moneys 25received and how the grant moneys were used. In case of a 26conflict between this requirement and the Grant Accountability   HB1866 Enrolled- 84 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1and Transparency Act, or with the rules of the Governor's 2Office of Management and Budget adopted thereunder, that Act 3and those rules shall control.4    (d) If an emergency telephone system board that receives 5funds from the Statewide 9-1-1 Fund fails to file the 9-1-1 6system financial reports as required under this Section, the 7Illinois State Police shall suspend and withhold monthly 8disbursements otherwise due to the emergency telephone system 9board under Section 30 of this Act until the report is filed.10    Any monthly disbursements that have been withheld for 12 11months or more shall be forfeited by the emergency telephone 12system board and shall be distributed proportionally by the 13Illinois State Police to compliant emergency telephone system 14boards that receive funds from the Statewide 9-1-1 Fund.15    Any emergency telephone system board not in compliance 16with this Section shall be ineligible to receive any 17consolidation grant or NG9-1-1 expenses infrastructure grant 18issued under this Act.19    (e) The Illinois State Police may adopt emergency rules 20necessary to implement the provisions of this Section. 21    (f) Any findings or decisions of the Illinois State Police 22under this Section shall be deemed a final administrative 23decision and shall be subject to judicial review under the 24Administrative Review Law. 25    (g) Beginning October 1, 2017, the Illinois State Police 26shall provide a quarterly report to the Statewide 9-1-1   HB1866 Enrolled- 85 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1Advisory Board of its expenditures from the Statewide 9-1-1 2Fund for the prior fiscal quarter. 3(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 4102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-366, eff. 1-1-24.) 5    (50 ILCS 750/80)6    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)7    Sec. 80. Continuation of Act; validation.8    (a) The General Assembly finds and declares that this 9amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly manifests the 10intention of the General Assembly to extend the repeal of this 11Act and have this Act continue in effect until December 31, 122020.13    (b) This Section shall be deemed to have been in 14continuous effect since July 1, 2017, and it shall continue to 15be in effect henceforward until it is otherwise lawfully 16repealed. All previously enacted amendments to this Act taking 17effect on or after July 1, 2017, are hereby validated. All 18actions taken in reliance on or under this Act by the Illinois 19State Police or any other person or entity are hereby 20validated. 21    (c) In order to ensure the continuing effectiveness of 22this Act, it is set forth in full and reenacted by this 23amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly. Striking and 24underscoring are used only to show changes being made to the 25base text. This reenactment is intended as a continuation of   HB1866 Enrolled- 86 -LRB104 09427 RTM 19487 b1this Act. It is not intended to supersede any amendment to this 2Act that is enacted by the 100th General Assembly. 3(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 4    (50 ILCS 750/99)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on December 31, 2025)6    Sec. 99. Repealer. This Act is repealed on December 31, 72027 2025.8(Source: P.A. 102-9, eff. 6-3-21; 103-366, eff. 7-28-23.) 9    (50 ILCS 750/10.2 rep.)10    (50 ILCS 750/15.3a rep.)11    (50 ILCS 750/15.5 rep.)12    (50 ILCS 750/15.5a rep.)13    (50 ILCS 750/15.6a rep.)14    (50 ILCS 750/15.6c rep.)15    (50 ILCS 750/15.7 rep.)16    (50 ILCS 750/15.8a rep.)17    (50 ILCS 750/75 rep.)18    Section 10. The Emergency Telephone System Act is amended 19by repealing Sections 10.2, 15.3a, 15.5, 15.5a, 15.6a, 15.6c, 2015.7, 15.8a, and 75. 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.